Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,115
Apprentice salon license; application; review; procedure; inspection.

Each application for a license to operate an apprentice salon shall be reviewed by the department for compliance with the requirements of the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act. In the event an application is denied, the applicant shall be informed in writing of the grounds for denial and such denial shall not prejudice further applications by the applicant. In the event an application is approved, the department shall immediately conduct an operation inspection of the proposed apprentice salon. A salon passing the inspection shall be issued a license to operate and may begin training apprentices upon receipt of notification to such effect. A salon failing the operation inspection shall submit, within fifteen days, evidence of corrective action to improve those aspects of operation found deficient. If, after a second inspection to be conducted within thirty days of receipt of evidence, the salon does not receive a satisfactory rating, or if evidence is not submitted within fifteen days, the application may be denied.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 114;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,153;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 377.